District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1102.09

Exemption for total expenses under $500.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 454, Pub. L. 93-376, title II, § 209
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(q), (r), 29 DCR 458
April 5, 2000, D.C. Law 13-79, § 2(a), 46 DCR 10460
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
1981 Ed., § 1-1419.
1973 Ed., § 1-1139.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).